Utah statutes.
58-17b-305.   Qualifications for licensure of pharmacy technician.

(1)  An applicant for licensure as a pharmacy technician shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  produce satisfactory evidence of good moral character as it relates to the applicant's ability to practice pharmacy;

(d)  complete a criminal background check and be free from criminal convictions as described in Section 58-1-501;

(e)  have no physical or mental condition of a nature which prevents the applicant from engaging in practice as a pharmacy technician with reasonable skill, competency, and safety to the public;

(f)  have completed a program and curriculum of education and training, meeting standards established by division rule made in collaboration with the board; and

(g)  successfully complete the examinations requirement within the time periods established by division rule made in collaboration with the board.

(2)  A pharmacist whose license has been denied, revoked, suspended, or restricted for disciplinary purposes is not eligible to be a licensed pharmacy technician while on probation with the division.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2013 General Session

